src-fst-phonology.twolc.md
# South Sámi morphophonological rule set                   

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sma/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 






















# Rules


**e deletion before i-initial suffix**  


* *manneX2ine*
* *mann00ine*


**Diphthong simplification ie:e**  



* *dåeried%>%^DISIMPem*
* *dåer0ed%>0em*

* ★*dåeried%>%^DISIMPem* (is not standard language)
* ★*dåeried%>0em* (is not standard language)

* *gieriehtse%>%^DISIMPm*
* *gier0ehtse%>0m*

* ★*gieriehtse%>%^DISIMPm* (is not standard language)
* ★*gieriehtse%>0m* (is not standard language)

* *gijmie%>%^COMPDISIMPbe*
* *gijm0e%>0be*

* ★*gijmie%>%^COMPDISIMPbe* (is not standard language)
* ★*gijmie%>0be* (is not standard language)





**Diphthong simplification oe:o**  



* *daaroest%>%^DISIMPem*
* *daaro0st%>0em*

* ★*daaroest%>%^DISIMPem* (is not standard language)
* ★*daaroest%>0em* (is not standard language)

* *gaaloehke%>%^DISIMPm*
* *gaalo0hke%>0m*

* ★*gaaloehke%>%^DISIMPm* (is not standard language)
* ★*gaaloehke%>0m* (is not standard language)




* *jearkoe%>%^COMPDISIMPbe*
* *jeark0e%>0be*

* ★*jearkoe%>%^COMPDISIMPbe* (is not standard language)
* ★*jearkoe%>0be* (is not standard language)



**a/e alternation**  



* *aatskad%>%^DISIMPem*
* *aatsked%>0em*

* ★*aatskad%>%^DISIMPem* (is not standard language)
* ★*aatskad%>0em* (is not standard language)

* *daktare%>%^DISIMPm*
* *daktere%>0m*

* ★*daktare%>%^DISIMPm* (is not standard language)
* ★*daktare%>0m* (is not standard language)


* *gæhtja%>%^COMPDISIMPbe*
* *gæhtje%>0be*

* ★*gæhtja%>%^COMPDISIMPbe* (is not standard language)
* ★*gæhtja%>0be* (is not standard language)












**a/i alternation**  



* *jåhtaj%^DISIMP%>em*
* *jåhtij0%>em*

* ★*jåhtaj%^DISIMP%>em* (is not standard language)
* ★*jåhtaj0%>em* (is not standard language)

**a/0 alternation**  








**Even syllabic verbs Du3 e/i alternation V**  

**Proper PlGen, PlCom**  



**Even syllabic verbs Du2, Du3, Pl1, Pl2 e/i class V **  


* *vååjn>eX4jibie*
* *vååjn>i0jibie*

* ★*vååjn>eX4jibie* (is not standard language)
* ★*vååjn>e0jibie* (is not standard language)

* *vååjn>eX3jægan*
* *vååjn>i0jægan*

* ★*vååjn>eX3jægan* (is not standard language)
* ★*vååjn>e0jægan* (is not standard language)

* *juht»ieje%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPm*
* *juht»i0je%>0m*

* ★*juht»ieje%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPm* (is not standard language)
* ★*juht»ieje%>0m* (is not standard language)






















* *kliht%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP*
* *klæhte»tje0*

* *kliht%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse*
* *klæhta»tj%>asse*

* *jepts%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP*
* *japtse»tje0*

* *jepts%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse*
* *japtsa»tj%>asse*

* *gull%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP*
* *gålle»tje0*

* *gull%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse*
* *gålla»tj%>asse*

* *biss%>%^1UMLam*
* *bæss%>0am*

* *belt%>%^1UMLam*
* *balt%>0am*

* *buhtj%>%^1UMLa*
* *båhtj%>0a*

* *paek%>%^1UMLa*
* *paak%>0a*

* *bået%>%^1UMLa*
* *båat%>0a*

* *buel%>%^1UMLa*
* *bual%>0a*

* *kliht%>%^1UMLan*
* *klæht%>0an*

* *jepts%>%^1UMLan*
* *japts%>0an*

* *gull%>%^1UMLan*
* *gåll%>0an*

* *gaevl%>%^1UMLan*
* *gaavl%>0an*

* *gået%>%^1UMLan*
* *gåat%>0an*

* *njuesl%>%^1UMLan*
* *njuasl%>0an*




* *jieht%>%^1UMLa*
* *jeaht%>0a*

* ★*jieht%>%^1UMLa* (is not standard language)
* ★*jieht%>0a* (is not standard language)

* *sjiell%>%^1UMLan*
* *sjeall%>0an*


* *gået^aLATUS»tje^DISIMP*
* *gåate»tje0*


* *gælj%>%^2UMLe*
* *gylj%>0e*

* *færhtje%>%^2UMLse*
* *fyrhtje%>0se*

* *hahtje%>%^2UMLse*
* *hohtje%>0se*

* *rånhtje%>%^2UMLse*
* *ronhtje%>0se*

* ★*færhtje%>%^2UMLse* (is not standard language)
* ★*færhtje%>0se* (is not standard language)

* ★*hahtje%>%^2UMLse* (is not standard language)
* ★*hahtje%>0se* (is not standard language)

* ★*rånhtje%>%^2UMLse* (is not standard language)
* ★*rånhtje%>0se* (is not standard language)








* *tjear%>%^2UMLe*
* *tjyör%>0e*

* ★*tjear%>%^2UMLe* (is not standard language)
* ★*tjear%>0e* (is not standard language)

* *bearke%>%^2UMLse*
* *byörke%>0se*

* ★*bearke%>%^2UMLse* (is not standard language)
* ★*bearke%>0se* (is not standard language)

* *mearhtje%>%^2UMLse*
* *myörhtje%>0se*

* ★*mearhtje%>%^2UMLse* (is not standard language)
* ★*mearhtje%>0se* (is not standard language)



* *haare%>%^2UMLse*
* *hååre%>0se*

* ★*haare%>%^2UMLse* (is not standard language)
* ★*haare%>0se* (is not standard language)

* *råafe%>%^2UMLse*
* *rååfe%>0se*

* ★*råafe%>%^2UMLse* (is not standard language)
* ★*råafe%>0se* (is not standard language)




* *mïnn%>%^3sUMLa*
* *mænn%>0a*

* *jovk%>%^3sUMLa*
* *jåvk%>0a*





* *tjïel%>%^3sUMLa*
* *tjeal%>0a*

* *roeht%>%^3sUMLa*
* *ruaht%>0a*



* *mïnn%>%^3dUMLien*
* *minn%>0ien*

* *bark%>%^3dUMLien*
* *berk%>0ien*

* *jovk%>%^3dUMLien*
* *juvk%>0ien*


* *tjïek%>%^3dUMLien*
* *tjiek%>0ien*

* *dïjveld»ovv%^3dUMLieh*
* *dïjveld»uvv0ieh*

* ★*dïjveld%»ovv%^3dUMLieh* (is not standard language)
* ★*dïjveld»ovv0ieh* (is not standard language)









* *jieht%>%^iUMLim*
* *jeeht%>0im*

* *tjael%>%^iUMLim*
* *tjeel%>0im*




* *bået%>%^iUMLim*
* *bööt%>0im*

* *vuejn%>%^iUMLim*
* *vööjn%>0im*







* *maan%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP*
* *maane»tje0*

* ★*maan%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP* (is not standard language)
* ★*maana»tje0* (is not standard language)

* *maan%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse*
* *maana»tj%>asse*

* ★*maan%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse* (is not standard language)
* ★*maane»tj%>asse* (is not standard language)



* *biss»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *byss»0edh*

* *sïrr»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *syrr»0edh*

* ★*sïrr»%^PASSUMLedh* (is not standard language)
* ★*sïrr»0edh* (is not standard language)


* *gælj»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *gylj»0edh*

* ★*gælj»%^PASSUMLedh* (is not standard language)
* ★*gælj»0edh* (is not standard language)



* *best»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *bost»0edh*

* ★*best»%^PASSUMLedh* (is not standard language)
* ★*best»0edh* (is not standard language)

* *darj»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *dorj»0edh*

* ★*darj»%^PASSUMLedh* (is not standard language)
* ★*darj»0edh* (is not standard language)



* *juht»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *joht»0edh*

* ★*juht»%^PASSUMLedh* (is not standard language)
* ★*juht»0edh* (is not standard language)

* *gåhp»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *gohp»0edh*

* ★*gåhp»%^PASSUMLedh* (is not standard language)
* ★*gåhp»0edh* (is not standard language)

* *govl»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *govl»0edh*




* *viedt»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *vyödt»0edh*

* ★*viedt»%^PASSUMLedh* (is not standard language)
* ★*viedt»0edh* (is not standard language)

* *tjear»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *tjyör»0edh*

* ★*tjear»%^PASSUMLedh* (is not standard language)
* ★*tjear»0edh* (is not standard language)

* *bïepm»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *byöpm»0edh*

* ★*bïepm»%^PASSUMLedh* (is not standard language)
* ★*bïepm»0edh* (is not standard language)


* *daejr»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *dååjr»0edh*

* *gaat»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *gååt»0edh*


* *gaat»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *gååt»0edh*

* *åest»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *ååst»0edh*


* *vuejn»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *vååjn»0edh*

* *guark»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *gåårk»0edh*

* *våaj»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *vååj»0edh*

* *voessj»%^PASSUMLedh*
* *vååssj»0edh*



* *buel»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh*
* *boel»0ehtjidh*

* ★*buel»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh* (is not standard language)
* ★*buel»0ehtjidh* (is not standard language)


* *paek»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh*
* *paak»0ehtjidh*

* ★*paek»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh* (is not standard language)
* ★*paek»0ehtjidh* (is not standard language)







* *veaj»%^didhUMLedidh*
* *vïej»0edidh*

* ★*veaj»%^didhUMLedidh* (is not standard language)
* ★*veaj»0edidh* (is not standard language)

* *guark»%^didhUMLedidh*
* *goerk»0edidh*

* ★*guark»%^didhUMLedidh* (is not standard language)
* ★*guark»0edidh* (is not standard language)


* *skælk»%^didhUMLedidh*
* *skïlk»0edidh*

* ★*skælk»%^didhUMLedidh* (is not standard language)
* ★*skælk»0edidh* (is not standard language)

* *plåtjk»%^didhUMLedidh*
* *plotjk»0edidh*

* ★*plåtjk»%^didhUMLedidh* (is not standard language)
* ★*plåtjk»0edidh* (is not standard language)





* *bået»iest»%^adteUMLalledh*
* *båat»0ast»0alledh*

* ★*bået»iest»%^adteUMLalledh* (is not standard language)
* ★*bået»0ast»0alledh* (is not standard language)

* ★*bået»iest»%^adteUMLalledh* (is not standard language)
* ★*båat»iest»0alledh* (is not standard language)


* *tjear»oel»%^adteUMLadtedh*
* *tjyör»0el»0adtedh*

* ★*tjear»oel»%^adteUMLadtedh* (is not standard language)
* ★*tjear»0el»0adtedh* (is not standard language)

* ★*tjear»oel»%^adteUMLadtedh* (is not standard language)
* ★*tjyör»oel»0adtedh* (is not standard language)





* *dåeriedi%>dh*
* *dåeriedi%>dh*

* *bisse%>dh*
* *bisse%>dh*

* *belte%>dh*
* *belte%>dh*

* *buhtje%>dh*
* *buhtje%>dh*

* *paeke%>dh*
* *paeke%>dh*

* *båete%>dh*
* *båete%>dh*

* *buele%>dh*
* *buele%>dh*

* *æbjo%>dh*
* *æbjo%>dh*

* *hajko%>dh*
* *hajko%>dh*

* *gåhpo%>dh*
* *gåhpo%>dh*

* *tjearo%>dh*
* *tjearo%>dh*

* *baajsko%>dh*
* *baajsko%>dh*

* *gåaro%>dh*
* *gåaro%>dh*

* *skælke%>dh*
* *skælke%>dh*

* *skajke%>dh*
* *skajke%>dh*

* *plåtjke%>dh*
* *plåtjke%>dh*

* *sleapke%>dh*
* *sleapke%>dh*

* *snjåarke%>dh*
* *snjåarke%>dh*

* *sïrre%>dh*
* *sïrre%>dh*

* *sarje%>dh*
* *sarje%>dh*

* *sodte%>dh*
* *sodte%>dh*

* *skïerke%>dh*
* *skïerke%>dh*

* *slaapke%>dh*
* *slaapke%>dh*

* *snjåare%>dh*
* *snjåare%>dh*

* *tjoehpe%>dh*
* *tjoehpe%>dh*

* *skylle%>dh*
* *skylle%>dh*

* *aalhteroste%>dh*
* *aalhteroste%>dh*

* *skyöre%>dh*
* *skyöre%>dh*

* *vååjne%>dh*
* *vååjne%>dh*

* *skilhte%>dh*
* *skilhte%>dh*

* *sijle%>dh*
* *sijle%>dh*

* *snjurme%>dh*
* *snjurme%>dh*

* *snjeere%>dh*
* *snjeere%>dh*

* *gööle%>dh*
* *gööle%>dh*



Spesialregel for 'soptsesovvedh' < soptsestidh.
Ingen andre verb har st > s framfor passivderivasjon.

* *soptsest»ovvedh*
* *soptses0»ovvedh*



* *laajhna#aaltoe*
* *laajhna-aaltoe*

* *aerpie#eeke*
* *aerpie-eeke*

* ★*laajhna#aaltoe* (is not standard language)
* ★*laajhna#aaltoe* (is not standard language)

* ★*aerpie#eeke* (is not standard language)
* ★*aerpie#eeke* (is not standard language)







* *Aevjie#aesie*
* *Aevjie#aesie*

* ★*Aevjie#aesiede* (is not standard language)
* ★*Aevjie-eesi0de* (is not standard language)
* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/phonology.twolc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sma/blob/main/../src/fst/phonology.twolc)</small>
